Florida, session 2026, SB638.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 22 23 Section 1.âParagraph (a) of subsection (12) of section 24 718.111, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 25 718.111âThe association.â 26 (12)âOFFICIAL RECORDS.â 27 (a)âFrom the inception of the association, the association 28 shall maintain each of the following items, if applicable, which 29 constitutes the official records of the association: 30 1.âA copy of the plans, permits, warranties, and other 31 items provided by the developer under s. 718.301(4). 32 2.âA copy of the recorded declaration of condominium of 33 each condominium operated by the association and each amendment 34 to each declaration. 35 3.âA copy of the recorded bylaws of the association and 36 each amendment to the bylaws. 37 4.âA certified copy of the articles of incorporation of the 38 association, or other documents creating the association, and 39 each amendment thereto. 40 5.âA copy of the current rules of the association. 41 6.âA book or books or electronic records that contain the 42 minutes of all meetings of the association, the board of 43 administration, any committee, and the unit owners, and a 44 recording of all such meetings that are conducted by video 45 conference. If there are approved minutes for a meeting held by 46 video conference, recordings of meetings that are conducted by 47 video conference must be maintained for at least 1 year after 48 the date the video recording is posted as required under 49 paragraph (g). 50 7.âA current roster of all unit owners and their mailing 51 addresses, unit identifications, voting certifications, and, if 52 known, telephone numbers. The association shall also maintain 53 the e-mail addresses and facsimile numbers of unit owners 54 consenting to receive notice by electronic transmission. In 55 accordance with sub-subparagraph (c)5.e., the e-mail addresses 56 and facsimile numbers are only accessible to unit owners if 57 consent to receive notice by electronic transmission is 58 provided, or if the unit owner has expressly indicated that such 59 personal information can be shared with other unit owners and 60 the unit owner has not provided the association with a request 61 to opt out of such dissemination with other unit owners. An 62 association must ensure that the e-mail addresses and facsimile 63 numbers are only used for the business operation of the 64 association and may not be sold or shared with outside third 65 parties. If such personal information is included in documents 66 that are released to third parties, other than unit owners, the 67 association must redact such personal information before the 68 document is disseminated. However, the association is not liable 69 for an inadvertent disclosure of the e-mail address or facsimile 70 number for receiving electronic transmission of notices unless 71 such disclosure was made with a knowing or intentional disregard 72 of the protected nature of such information. 73 8.âAll current insurance policies of the association and 74 condominiums operated by the association. 75 9.âA current copy of any management agreement, lease, or 76 other contract to which the association is a party or under 77 which the association or the unit owners have an obligation or 78 responsibility. 79 10.âBills of sale or transfer for all property owned by the 80 association. 81 11.âAccounting records for the association and separate 82 accounting records for each condominium that the association 83 operates. Any person who knowingly or intentionally defaces or 84 destroys such records, or who knowingly or intentionally fails 85 to create or maintain such records, with the intent of causing 86 harm to the association or one or more of its members, is 87 personally subject to a civil penalty pursuant to s. 88 718.501(1)(e). The accounting records must include, but are not 89 limited to: 90 a.âAccurate, itemized, and detailed records of all receipts 91 and expenditures, including all bank statements and ledgers. 92 b.âAll invoices, transaction receipts, or deposit slips 93 that substantiate any receipt or expenditure of funds by the 94 association. 95 c.âA current account and a monthly, bimonthly, or quarterly 96 statement of the account for each unit designating the name of 97 the unit owner, the due date and amount of each assessment, the 98 amount paid on the account, and the balance due. 99 d.âAll audits, reviews, accounting statements, structural 100 integrity reserve studies, and financial reports of the 101 association or condominium. Structural integrity reserve studies 102 must be maintained for at least 15 years after the study is 103 completed. 104 e.âAll contracts for work to be performed. Bids for work to 105 be performed are also considered official records and must be 106 maintained by the association for at least 1 year after receipt 107 of the bid. 108 12.âBallots, sign-in sheets, voting proxies, and all other 109 papers and electronic records relating to voting by unit owners, 110 which must be maintained for 1 year from the date of the 111 election, vote, or meeting to which the document relates, 112 notwithstanding paragraph (b). 113 13.âAll rental records if the association is acting as 114 agent for the rental of condominium units. 115 14.âA copy of the current question and answer sheet as 116 described in s. 718.504. 117 15.âA copy of the inspection reports described in ss. 118 553.899 and 718.301(4)(p) and any other inspection report 119 relating to a structural or life safety inspection of 120 condominium property. Such record must be maintained by the 121 association for 15 years after receipt of the report. 122 16.âBids for materials, equipment, or services. 123 17.âAll affirmative acknowledgments made pursuant to s. 124 718.121(4)(c). 125 18.âA copy of all building permits. 126 19.âA copy of all satisfactorily completed board member 127 educational certificates. 128 20.âA copy of all affidavits required by this chapter. 129 21.âA copy of the associationâs turnover certificate. 130 22.âA copy of the associationâs annual report required 131 under s. 617.1622. 132 23.21.âAll other written records of the association not 133 specifically included in the foregoing which are related to the 134 operation of the association. 135 Section 2.âSection 718.124, Florida Statutes, is amended to 136 read: 137 718.124âLimitation on actions by association.â 138 (1)âThe statute of limitations and statute of repose for 139 any actions in law or equity which a condominium association or 140 a cooperative association may have do shall not begin to run 141 until the unit owners have elected a majority of the members of 142 the board of administration. 143 (2)âThe tolling of any applicable statute of limitations 144 and statute of repose under subsection (1) does not apply to 145 actions that are subject to s. 95.11(3)(b). Actions that are 146 subject to s. 95.11(3)(b) must be commenced within the time 147 periods prescribed in s. 95.11(3)(b), and subsection (1) may not 148 be construed to extend, suspend, or otherwise toll such 149 limitation periods. 150 Section 3.âSubsection (2) of section 718.301, Florida 151 Statutes, is amended to read: 152 718.301âTransfer of association control; claims of defect 153 by association.â 154 (2)(a)âWithin 75 days after the unit owners other than the 155 developer are entitled to elect a member or members of the board 156 of administration of an association, the association shall call, 157 and give not less than 60 daysâ notice of an election for the 158 members of the board of administration. The election shall 159 proceed as provided in s. 718.112(2)(d). The notice may be given 160 by any unit owner if the association fails to do so. Upon 161 election of the first unit owner other than the developer to the 162 board of administration, the developer shall forward to the 163 division the name and mailing address of the unit owner board 164 member. 165 (b)âWithin 30 days after the election in which the unit 166 owners other than the developer elect a majority of the members 167 of the board of administration of an association, the board 168 shall file with the division a turnover certificate. The 169 turnover certificate must include the date of the election and 170 the names and mailing addresses of each elected unit owner board 171 member. The division shall maintain a publicly accessible online 172 database of turnover certificates which must include the name 173 and mailing address of each condominium, the date on which 174 turnover occurred, and a digital copy of the turnover 175 certificate. 176 Section 4.âSubsection (4) is added to section 718.501, 177 Florida Statutes, to read: 178 718.501âAuthority, responsibility, and duties of Division 179 of Florida Condominiums, Timeshares, and Mobile Homes.â 180 (4)âThe division shall create and maintain a searchable 181 electronic database of each turnover certificate filed pursuant 182 to s. 718.301(2)(b). The database must include the name and 183 mailing address of each condominium association, the date on 184 which turnover occurred, and a digital copy of the turnover 185 certificate. The division shall adopt rules prescribing the form 186 and content of the turnover certificate and the procedures for 187 electronically filing a turnover certificate. 188 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.